Utah statutes.
70A-8-103.   Acquisition of security or financial asset or interest therein.
(1)  A person acquires a security or an interest therein, under this chapter,
if:
(a)  the person is a purchaser to whom a security is delivered pursuant to
Section 70A-8-301; or
(b)  the person acquires a security entitlement to the security pursuant to
Section 70A-8-501.
(2)  A person acquires a financial asset, other than a security, or an
interest therein, under this chapter, if the person acquires a security
entitlement to the financial asset.
(3)  A person who acquires a security entitlement to a security or other
financial asset has the rights specified in Part 5, but is a purchaser of any
security, security entitlement, or other financial asset held by the
securities intermediary only to the extent provided in Section 70A-8-503.
(4)  Unless the context shows that a different meaning is intended, a person
who is required by other law, regulation, rule, or agreement to transfer,
deliver, present, surrender, exchange, or otherwise put in the possession of
another person a security or financial asset satisfies that requirement by
causing the other person to acquire an interest in the security or financial
asset pursuant to Subsection (1) or (2).
